tables/gujarati.cti
# exceptions to general rules above when sequences of vowels together
sufword \x0A86\x0A87 345-24 # LETTER AA + LETTER I
sufword \x0A86\x0A88 345-35 # LETTER AA + LETTER II
sufword \x0A86\x0A87\x0A86 345-24-345 # LETTER AA + LETTER I + LETTER AA
sufword \x0A86\x0A88\x0A86 345-35-345 # LETTER AA + LETTER II + LETTER AA
sufword \x0A86\x0A88\x0A86\x0A88 345-35-345-35 # LETTER AA + LETTER II + LETTER AA + LETTER II
sufword \x0A86\x0A8F 345-15 # LETTER AA + LETTER EE
sufword \x0A86\x0A93 345-135 # LETTER AA + LETTER OO
sufword \x0A86\x0A89 345-136 # LETTER AA + LETTER U
sufword \x0A87\x0A89 24-136 # LETTER I + LETTER U
sufword \x0A90\x0A89 34-136 # LETTER AI +LETTER U
sufword \x0A93\x0A89 135-136 # LETTER OO +LETTER U
midendword \x0ABE\x0A82\x0A89 345-3-136 # SIGN AA + BINDI + LETTER U
midendword \x0ABE\x0A8F 345-15 # SIGN AA + LETTER EE
midendword \x0ABE\x0A87 345-24 # SIGN AA + LETTER I
midendword \x0ABE\x0A88 345-35 # SIGN AA + LETTER II
midendword \x0ABE\x0A87\x0A86 345-24-345 # SIGN AA + LETTER I + LETTER AA
midendword \x0ABE\x0A88\x0A86 345-35-345 # SIGN AA + LETTER II + LETTER AA
midendword \x0ABE\x0A88\x0A8F 345-35-15 # SIGN AA + LETTER II + LETTER EE
midendword \x0ABE\x0A88\x0A93 345-35-135 # SIGN AA + LETTER II + LETTER OO
midendword \x0ABE\x0A89 345-136 # SIGN AA + LETTER U
midendword \x0ABE\x0A8A 345-1256 # SIGN AA + LETTER UU
midendword \x0ABE\x0A93 345-135 # SIGN AA + LETTER OO
midendword \x0ABE\x0A93\x0A8F 345-135-15 # SIGN AA + LETTER OO + LETTER EE
midendword \x0ABF\x0A86 24-345 # SIGN I + LETTER AA
midendword \x0ABF\x0A86\x0A87\x0A86 24-345-24-345 # SIGN I + LETTER AA + LETTER I + LETTER AA
midendword \x0ABF\x0A86\x0A88 24-345-35 # SIGN I + LETTER AA + LETTER II
midendword \x0ABF\x0A86\x0A89 24-345-136 # SIGN I + LETTER AA + LETTER U
midendword \x0ABF\x0A86\x0A8F 24-345-15 # SIGN I + LETTER AA + LETTER EE
midendword \x0ABF\x0A86\x0A93 24-345-135 # SIGN I + LETTER AA + LETTER OO
midendword \x0ABF\x0A8F 24-15 # SIGN I + LETTER EE
midendword \x0ABF\x0A93 24-135 # SIGN I + LETTER OO
midendword \x0ABF\x0A93\x0A8F 24-135-15 # SIGN I + LETTER OO + LETTER EE
midendword \x0ABF\x0A89 24-136 # SIGN I + LETTER U
midendword \x0AC0\x0A86 35-345 # SIGN II + LETTER AA
midendword \x0AC0\x0A89 35-136 # SIGN II + LETTER U
midendword \x0AC0\x0A8F 35-15 # SIGN II + LETTER EE
midendword \x0AC0\x0A93 35-135 # SIGN II + LETTER OO
midendword \x0AC0\x0A93\x0A8F 35-135-15 # SIGN II + LETTER OO + LETTER EE
midendword \x0AC1\x0A86 136-345 # SIGN U + LETTER AA
midendword \x0AC1\x0A86\x0A8F 136-345-15 # SIGN U + LETTER AA + LETTER EE
midendword \x0AC1\x0A86\x0A88\x0A8F 136-345-35-15 # SIGN U + LETTER AA + LETTER II + LETTER EE
midendword \x0AC1\x0A86\x0A89 136-345-136 # SIGN U + LETTER AA + LETTER U
midendword \x0AC1\x0A8F 136-15 # SIGN U + LETTER EE
midendword \x0AC1\x0A88 136-35 # SIGN U + LETTER II
midendword \x0AC1\x0A93 136-135 # SIGN U + LETTER OO
midendword \x0AC2\x0A86 1256-345 # SIGN UU + LETTER AA
midendword \x0AC2\x0A88 1256-35 # SIGN UU + LETTER II
midendword \x0AC2\x0A8F 1256-15 # SIGN UU + LETTER EE
midendword \x0AC3\x0A86 5-1235-345 # SIGN VOCALIC R + LETTER AA
midendword \x0AC7\x0A86 15-345 # SIGN EE + LETTER AA
midendword \x0AC7\x0A88 15-35 # SIGN EE + LETTER II
midendword \x0AC7\x0A88\x0A8F 15-35-15 # SIGN EE + LETTER II + LETTER EE
midendword \x0AC7\x0A8A 15-1256 # SIGN EE + LETTER UU
midendword \x0AC7\x0A93 15-135 # SIGN EE + LETTER OO
midendword \x0AC8\x0A86 34-345 # SIGN AI + LETTER AA
midendword \x0AC9\x0A87 1346-24 # SIGN CANDRA O + LETTER I
midendword \x0ACB\x0A8F 135-15 # SIGN OO + LETTER EE
midendword \x0ACB\x0A88\x0A8F 135-35-15 # SIGN OO + LETTER II + LETTER EE
midendword \x0ACB\x0A87\x0A86 135-24-345 # SIGN OO + LETTER I + LETTER AA
midendword \x0ACB\x0A88 135-35 # SIGN OO + LETTER II
midendword \x0ACB\x0A88\x0A86 135-35-345 # SIGN OO + LETTER II + LETTER AA
midendword \x0ACB\x0A8A 135-1256 # SIGN OO + LETTER UU
midendword \x0ACC\x0A89 246-136 # SIGN AU + LETTER U


# consonent followed by vowel but not matra - backtranslation
always \x0A95\x0A88 13-1-35 # LETTER KA + LETTER II
always \x0A95\x0A88\x0A06 13-1-35-345 # LETTER KA + LETTER II + LETTER AA
always \x0A97\x0A88 1245-1-35 # LETTER GA + LETTER II
always \x0A97\x0A88\x0A06 1245-1-35-345 # LETTER GA + LETTER II + LETTER AA
sufword \x0A97\x0A8F 1245-1-15 # LETTER GA + LETTER EE
always \x0A9C\x0A88 245-1-35 # LETTER JA + LETTER II
always \x0AA3\x0A93 3456-1-135 # LETTER NNA + LETTER OO
always \x0AA5\x0A88 1456-1-35 # LETTER THA + LETTER II
always \x0AA8\x0A88 1345-1-35 # LETTER NA + LETTER II
always \x0AAA\x0A88 1234-1-35 # LETTER PA + LETTER II
always \x0AAA\x0A89 1234-1-136 # LETTER PA + LETTER U
always \x0AAA\x0A8F 1234-1-15 # LETTER PA + LETTER EE
always \x0AAA\x0A93 1234-1-135 # LETTER PA + LETTER OO
always \x0AAC\x0A88 12-1-35 # LETTER BA + LETTER II - as in Mumbai
always \x0AAD\x0A88 45-1-35 # LETTER BHA + LETTER II
always \x0AAE\x0A88 134-1-35 # LETTER MA + LETTER II
always \x0AAE\x0A8A 134-1-1256 # LETTER MA + LETTER UU
always \x0AB0\x0A88 1235-1-35 # LETTER RA + LETTER II
always \x0AB2\x0A88 123-1-35 # LETTER LA + LETTER II
# always \x0AB2\x0A88\x0A86 123-1-35-345 # LETTER LA + LETTER II + LETTER AA
# always \x0AB2\x0A88\x0AA8 123-1-35-1345 # LETTER LA + LETTER II + LETTER NA
# always \x0AB2\x0A88\x0AB6 123-1-35-146 # LETTER LA + LETTER II + LETTER SHA
always \x0AB2\x0A93 123-1-135 # LETTER LA + LETTER OO
word \x0AB2\x0A88 123-1-35 # LETTER LA + LETTER II

# So 3456 backtranslated to NNA not number sign
nofor midendword \x0AA3 3456 # GUJARATI LETTER NNA

# consonent followed by vowel but not matra

attribute  GujaratiVowel \x0A87\x0A88\x0A89\x0A8A\x0A8B\x0A8C\x0A8D\x0A8F\x0A90\x0A91\x0A93\x0A94
attribute Halant \x0ACD

before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0A95	13-1	# GUJARATI LETTER KA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0A96	46-1	# GUJARATI LETTER KHA
before GujaratiVowel always 	\x0A97	1245-1	# GUJARATI LETTER GA
before GujaratiVowel  always 	\x0A98	126-1	# GUJARATI LETTER GHA
before GujaratiVowel  always 	\x0A9A	14-1	# GUJARATI LETTER CA
before GujaratiVowel  always  	\x0A9B	16-1	# GUJARATI LETTER CHA
before GujaratiVowel  always  	\x0A9C	245-1	# GUJARATI LETTER JA
before GujaratiVowel  always  	\x0A9D	356-1	# GUJARATI LETTER JHA
before GujaratiVowel  always 	\x0A9F	23456-1	# GUJARATI LETTER TTA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AA0	2456-1	# GUJARATI LETTER TTHA
before GujaratiVowel  always 	\x0AA1	1246-1	# GUJARATI LETTER DDA
before GujaratiVowel  always  	\x0AA2 	123456-1	# GUJARATI LETTER DDHA
before GujaratiVowel  always 	\x0AA3 		3456-1	# GUJARATI LETTER NNA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AA4	2345-1	# GUJARATI LETTER TA
before GujaratiVowel  always 	\x0AA5 	1456-1	# GUJARATI LETTER THA
before GujaratiVowel  always 	\x0AA6 	145-1	# GUJARATI LETTER DA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AA7 	2346-1	# GUJARATI LETTER DHA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AA8 	1345-1	# GUJARATI LETTER NA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AAA 	1234-1	# GUJARATI LETTER PA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AAB 	124-1	# GUJARATI LETTER PHA
before GujaratiVowel  always 	\x0AAC 	12-1	# GUJARATI LETTER BA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AAD 	45-1	# GUJARATI LETTER BHA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AAE 	134-1	# GUJARATI LETTER MA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AAF 	13456-1	# GUJARATI LETTER YA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AB0 	1235-1	# GUJARATI LETTER RA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AB2 	123-1	# GUJARATI LETTER LA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AB3 	456-1	# GUJARATI LETTER LLA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AB5 	1236-1	# GUJARATI LETTER VA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AB6 	146-1	# GUJARATI LETTER SHA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AB7 	12346-1	# GUJARATI LETTER SSA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AB8	234-1	# GUJARATI LETTER SA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AB9	125-1	# GUJARATI LETTER HA
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AC3	61235-1	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC R
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AC4	5-1235-1	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC RR
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AE0	5-1235-1	# GUJARATI LETTER VOCALIC RR
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AE1	6-123-1 	# GUJARATI LETTER VOCALIC LL
before GujaratiVowel  always	\x0AE3	6-123-1 	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC LL

# so dot 6 backtranslated VISARGA not capital sign
always \x0A83 6 # VISARGA

replace \x0ABC # Nukhta
